Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2507.02
State Department
of Education; duties.

The State Department of Education
shall maintain its responsibility under the Special Education Act regarding
special education and related services and
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to section 43-2516
that meet the requirements of subchapter III of the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1431 to 1445, as such act and sections
existed on January 1, 2013, and the regulations adopted thereunder.
The department shall provide grants for the costs of such programs to the
school district of residence as provided in section 79-1132.

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1049;

Laws 2013, LB410, § 1.

Special Education Act, see section 79-1110.